California, session 20252026, AB1257.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 91 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:91. The department shall improve and maintain the state highways, including all traversable highways which that have been adopted or designated as state highways by the commission, as provided in this code.